Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.200

Disciplinary action—Grounds.

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action against any applicant or licensee under this chapter if the licensee or applicant:

(1) Has been found to have violated any provisions of chapter 19.86 RCW;

(2) Has engaged in a practice prohibited under RCW 18.16.060 without first obtaining, and maintaining in good standing, the license required by this chapter;

(3) Has engaged in the commercial practice of cosmetology, hair design, barbering, manicuring, esthetics, or master esthetics in a school;

(4) Has not provided a safe, sanitary, and good moral environment for students in a school or the public;

(5) Has failed to display licenses required in this chapter; or

(6) Has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it.

[ 2015 c 62 s 10; 2013 c 187 s 10; 2004 c 51 s 4. Prior: 2002 c 111 s 12; 2002 c 86 s 217; 1991 c 324 s 14; 1984 c 208 s 13.]

NOTES:

Notice of chapter 51, Laws of 2004—Effective date—2004 c 51: See notes following RCW 18.16.060.

Effective date—2002 c 111: See note following RCW 18.16.010.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.